Washington statutes.
RCW 7.56.090

Action for damages—Limitation.

When judgment is rendered in favor of the plaintiff, he or she may, if he or she has not claimed his or her damages in the information, have his or her action for the damages at any time within one year after the judgment.

[ 2011 c 336 s 241; Code 1881 s 710; 1877 p 144 s 714; 1854 p 217 s 476; RRS s 1042.]